Hawaii statutes.
[§141-40] Rulemaking.
The board shall adopt rules concerning industrial hemp production no later than
July 1, 2017, including rules establishing reasonable fees for licenses,
permits, or other necessary expenses to defray the cost of implementing and operating
the industrial hemp pilot program in this State on an ongoing basis. [L 2016, c
228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next